Washington statutes.
RCW 17.04.150

Powers—Weed inspector.

The board of directors of such weed district shall have power:

(1) To adopt rules and regulations, plans, methods, and means for the purpose of destroying, preventing, and exterminating the weed or weeds specified in the petition, and to supervise, carry out, and enforce such rules, regulations, plans, methods, and means.

(2) To appoint a weed inspector and to require from him or her a bond in such sum as the directors may determine for the faithful discharge of his or her duties, and to pay the cost of such bond from the funds of such district; and to direct such weed inspector in the discharge of his or her duties; and to pay such weed inspector from the funds of such district such per diem or salary for the time employed in the discharge of his or her duties as the directors shall determine.

[ 2011 c 336 s 447; 1961 c 250 s 3; 1929 c 125 s 9; RRS s 2778-1. Prior: 1921 c 150 s 6.]